Oklahoma, session 2026, SB593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1024.1, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 103, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1024.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1024.1. A. As used in Sections 1021, 1021.1 through


1021.4, Sections 1022, 1023, and Sections 1040.8 through 1040.24 of


this title, “child pornography” sexual abuse material” means:


1. Any visual depiction of a child engaged in any act of


sexually explicit conduct;

Req. No. 1324 Page 1


2. Any visual depiction of a child that has been adapted,


altered, or modified so that the child depicted appears to be


engaged in any act of sexually explicit conduct; or


3. Any visual depiction that appears to be a child, regardless


of whether the image is a depiction of an actual child, a computer-


generated image, or an image altered to appear to be a child,


engaged in any act of sexually explicit conduct, and such visual


depiction is obscene.


B. Each visual depiction or individual image of child


pornography shall constitute a separate item and act.


C. As used in Sections 1021 through 1024.4 and Sections 1040.8


through 1040.24 of this title:


1. “Child” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age;


2. “Obscene” means any performance or depiction, in any form or


on any medium, if said the material when taken as a whole:


a. appeals to the prurient interest in sex as determined


by the average person applying the contemporary


standards of their community,


b. depicts, represents, or displays sexually explicit


conduct in a patently offensive way, and


c. a reasonable person would find the material or


performance lacks serious literary, artistic,


educational, political, or scientific value;



Req. No. 1324 Page 2


3. “Performance” means any display, live, recorded, or


transmitted, in any form or medium;


4. “Sexually explicit conduct” means any of the following


whether actual or simulated:


a. acts of sexual intercourse,


b. acts of oral and anal sodomy,


c. acts of masturbation,


d. acts of sexual activity with an animal,


e. acts of sadomasochism including:


(1) flagellation or torture by or upon any person who


is nude or clad in undergarments or in a costume


which is of a revealing nature, or


(2) the condition of being fettered, bound, or


otherwise physically restrained on the part of


one who is nude or so clothed,


f. acts of excretion in a sexual context, or


g. exhibiting genitalia, breast, or pubic area for the


purpose of the sexual stimulation of the viewer;


5. “Explicit child pornography” sexual abuse material” means


material which a law enforcement officer can immediately identify as


child pornography sexual abuse material; and


6. “Unlawful pornography” means any visual depiction or


individual image stored or contained in any format on any medium


including, but not limited to, film, motion picture, videotape,

Req. No. 1324 Page 3


photograph, negative, undeveloped film, slide, photographic product,


reproduction of a photographic product, play, or performance in


which a person is engaged in any of the following acts with a


person:


a. sexual intercourse which is normal or perverted,


b. anal sodomy,


c. sexual activity with an animal,


d. sadomasochistic abuse,


e. flagellation or torture,


f. physical restraint such as binding or fettering in the


context of sexual conduct,


g. fellatio or cunnilingus,


h. excretion in the context of sexual conduct,


i. lewd exhibition of the uncovered genitals in the


context of masturbation or other sexual conduct, and


j. lewd exhibition of the uncovered genitals, buttocks,


or, if such person is female, the breast, for the


purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer; and


7. “Visual depiction” means any depiction, picture, movie,


performance, or image displayed, stored, shared, or transmitted in


any format and on any medium including data that is capable of being


converted into a depiction, picture, movie, performance, or image.


D. It is the intent of the Legislature that every provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word in the

Req. No. 1324 Page 4


definition of unlawful pornography is severable from each other,


such that if any of the listed items is found by a court to be


invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining items will be severed and


may not be affected. All constitutionally valid applications of


this section shall be severed from any application that a court


finds to be invalid, leaving the valid applications in force,


because it is the intent and priority of the Legislature that the


valid applications be allowed to stand alone. Even if a reviewing


court finds a provision of this section to be an unconstitutional


restraint in a large or substantial fraction of relevant cases, the


applications that do not present an unconstitutional restraint shall


be severed from the remaining applications and shall remain in


force, and shall be treated as if the Legislature had enacted a


statute limited to the person, group of persons, or circumstances


for which the application of the statute does not present an


unconstitutional restraint on protected speech. If any court


declares or finds a provision of this section facially


unconstitutional, when discrete applications of that provision can


be enforced against a persons, group of persons, or circumstances


without violating the United States Constitution and Oklahoma


Constitution, those applications shall be severed from all remaining


applications of the provision, and the provision shall be


interpreted as if the Legislature had enacted a provision limited to


the person, group of persons, or circumstances for which the

Req. No. 1324 Page 5


provision’s application will not violate the United States


Constitution and Oklahoma Constitution.


E. The Legislature further declares that it would have enacted


this section, and each provision, subsection, sentence, clause,


phrase, or word, and all constitutional applications of this


section, irrespective of the fact that any provision, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word, or application of this section,


were to be declared unconstitutional or to represent an


unconstitutional restraint. If any provision of this section is


found by any court to be unconstitutionally vague, then the


applications of that provision that do not present constitutional


vagueness problems shall be severed and remain in force. No court


may decline to enforce the severability requirements of this section


on the grounds that severance would rewrite the statute or involve


the court in legislative or lawmaking activity.


F. Each of the items of unlawful pornography in paragraph 6 of


subsection C of this section are depictions of sexual conduct which


are patently offensive under contemporary community standards in


this state, and have as their dominant theme an appeal to prurient


interest in sex under contemporary community standards of this


state, and may not be produced or distributed within the state if


they lack serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or


scientific purposes or value.



Req. No. 1324 Page 6


G. Any person, other than an officer or employee of a state or


local governmental entity in this state, may bring a civil action


against any person who:


1. Produces or distributes unlawful pornography that lacks


serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or scientific


purposes or value;


2. Knowingly engages in conduct that aids or abets the


production or distribution of unlawful pornography that lacks


serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or scientific


purposes or value; or


3. Intends to engage in the conduct provided for in paragraphs


and 2 of this subsection.


H. If a claimant prevails in an action brought under this


section, the court shall award:


1. Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from


violating this section or engaging in acts that aid or abet


violations of this section;


2. Statutory damages not less than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) for each image or depiction produced or distributed


within this state; and


3. Court costs and attorney fees.


I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a court may not


award court costs or attorney fees to a defendant in an action


brought under this section.

Req. No. 1324 Page 7


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1024.2, as


amended by Section 15, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1024.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1024.2. A. It shall be unlawful for any person to buy,


procure, view, traffic, or possess child:


1. Child sexual abuse material or obscene materials; or


2. Unlawful pornography that lacks serious literary, artistic,


educational, political, or scientific purposes or value as defined


in violation of Sections Section 1024.1 through 1024.4 of this


title. Such


B. 1. A person who violates paragraph 1 of subsection A of


this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony and shall


be imprisoned punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a period of not more less than twenty


(20) ten (10) years or nor more than thirty (30) years, and a fine


up to, but not exceeding, Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)


or by both such fine and imprisonment not to exceed Two Hundred


Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00). A person who receives a


second or subsequent conviction pursuant to this subsection shall be


punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for not less than fifteen (15) years nor more than fifty


(50) years and a fine not to exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars


($300,000.00).



Req. No. 1324 Page 8


2. A person who violates paragraph 2 of subsection A of this


section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not


more than ten (10) years and a fine not to exceed One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for each violation.


3. For purposes of this section, “trafficking pornography”


means the production, sale, distribution, transportation, or


dissemination of pornography through any medium, including physical


or electronic means, for financial or material gain or with intent


to exploit.


a. Trafficking of child sexual abuse material or unlawful


pornography conducted through organized operations


shall be punishable by imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections for a term not more than


forty (40) years nor less than fifteen (15) years and


a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($500,000.00).


b. Victims of trafficking offenses may recover statutory


damages not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars


($50,000.00) per occurrence, attorney fees, and


injunctive relief.


This section shall not be construed to prevent spouses from sending


images of a sexual nature to each other.



Req. No. 1324 Page 9


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1040.8, as


amended by Section 18, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1040.8), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1040.8. A. No person shall knowingly photograph, act


in, pose for, model for, print, sell, offer for sale, give away,


exhibit, publish, offer to publish, or otherwise distribute,


display, or exhibit any book, magazine, story, pamphlet, paper,


writing, card, advertisement, circular, print, picture, photograph,


motion picture film, electronic video game or recording, image,


cast, slide, figure, instrument, statue, drawing, presentation, or


other article which is obscene material, unlawful pornography, or


child sexual abuse material, as defined in Section 1024.1 of this


title. In the case of any unsolicited mailing of any of the


material listed in this section, the offense is deemed complete from


the time such material is deposited in any post office or delivered


to any person with intent that it shall be forwarded. Also, unless


preempted by federal law, no unsolicited mail which is harmful to


minors pursuant to Section 1040.75 of this title shall be mailed to


any person. The party mailing the materials specified in this


section may be indicted and tried in any county wherein such


material is deposited or delivered, or in which it is received by


the person to whom it is addressed.


B. Any person who violates any provision of this section


involving obscene materials or unlawful pornography, upon

Req. No. 1324 Page 10


conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished


by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or


by both such fine and imprisonment.


C. Any person who violates any provision of this section


involving child sexual abuse material, upon conviction, shall be


guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than three (3)


years and not more than twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not less


than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and


imprisonment. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent


violation shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than ten (10)


years and not more than thirty (30) years, or by a fine of not less


than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by both such fine and


imprisonment. The violator, upon conviction, shall be required to


register as a sex offender under the Sex Offenders Registration Act.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1324 CN 1/19/2025 5:39:31 AM









Req. No. 1324 Page 11